California statutes. Water Code
If the board determines that the bonds shall be payable from assessments upon all such real property, or if the proceedings for the formation of the district require that the bonds be so payable, the board shall so state in the resolution calling the bond election, and the notice of the election shall contain a statement to that effect. If the bonds receive the necessary two-thirds vote at the bond election, then they shall be payable from assessments upon all real property in the district, and such real property shall be subject to taxation for the payment of principal and interest of such bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Initiation of Proceedings [74800. - 74804.]

74800.

The board, whenever the interest of the district shall require it, may cause a report to be made to the effect that the acquisition of certain property or works or the construction of such works is convenient or necessary to serve or fulfill the purposes of the district and that the cost thereof cannot be paid for out of the annual revenue of the district. The report shall be in such detail and shall be accompanied by such exhibits as will disclose the purpose sought to be accomplished and the means to be employed therefor. The report shall be printed in convenient form for distribution to the electors of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74801.

After the printing of the report the board, by resolution adopted by a majority of its members, may call an election to be held in the district for the purpose of authorizing the incurring of a bonded indebtedness by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74802.

The resolution shall specify all of the following:

(a) The purpose for which the indebtedness is to be incurred.

(b) The amount of bonds proposed to be issued.

(c) The maximum rate of interest the bonds shall bear.

(d) The number of years, not exceeding 40, the whole or any part of the bonds are to run until maturity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74803.

The resolution shall further provide for submitting the question of the incurring of the indebtedness to the qualified electors of the district at an election called for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74804.

In determining the amount of bonded indebtedness to be incurred, the board may include all costs and estimated costs incidental to or connected with the acquisition, construction or financing of the works or property set forth in the report required by Section 74800, and all engineering, inspection, legal and fiscal agent’s fees, costs of the bond election and of the issuance of the bonds, and bond interest estimated to accrue during the construction period and for a period of not to exceed 12 months after completion of construction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Notice of Bond Election [74820. - 74822.]

74820.

Notice shall be given of the bond election by publication pursuant to Section 6062 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation published in the district and the first publication shall be at least 30 days prior to the date fixed for the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74821.

The notice of the bond election shall state all of the following:

(a) The time and place for holding the election.

(b) The names or numbers of election precincts, which may be the general election precincts established by the boards of supervisors for general state or county elections, or a consolidation of such precincts, or such other special precincts for the purpose of the bond election as the board may designate and establish.

(c) The location of the polling places and the names of the election officers appointed to conduct the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74822.

The notice of the bond election shall also state all of the following:

(a) The amount of the debt proposed to be incurred.

(b) The purpose thereof, in brief form, with a reference to the report required by Section 74800 for further particulars.

(c) The number of years the bonds or any part thereof are to run until maturity.

(d) The maximum rate of interest the bonds shall bear.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Bond Election [74830. - 74834.]

74830.

The manner of holding and conducting the bond election, the selection of officers to conduct the election, the designation of precincts and polling places, the preparation, receipt, counting, and return of ballots, and the canvassing and determining of the results of the election shall be as provided for the election of directors as nearly as practicable, and in particulars not so provided shall be in accordance with the general laws of the state relative to elections whereat propositions are submitted and voted upon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74831.

Several propositions may be submitted at the same bond election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74832.

Only qualified electors of the district may vote at the bond election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74833.

The ballots at the bond election shall contain a general statement of the amount and purpose of the bonds to be issued. To the right of or below the statement of the proposition to be voted on, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 67.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

74834.

If a bond election has been fairly held and conducted, no informality or omission to perform a prescribed duty shall be held to invalidate or affect the legality of any bonded debt authorized to be incurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Issuance and Terms [74850. - 74857.]

74850.

If two-thirds of the votes cast upon the proposition at the bond election favor the proposition submitted, the proposition shall be deemed to have been accepted by the voters and to authorize the incurring of a bonded debt and the issuance of bonds in the amount of and for the purpose stated in the proposition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 68.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

74851.

The board may issue the bonds of the district for the whole or any part of the amount of the indebtedness authorized, and may, from time to time, provide for the issuance of such amounts as are necessary, until the full amount of the bonds authorized have been issued. Each separate issue shall be given a serial number or letter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74852.

The board shall, by a resolution adopted by a majority of its members, prescribe the form of the bonds and of the coupons attached thereto and fix the time when the whole or any part of the principal shall become due and payable. The payment of the first installment may be deferred for a period not longer than five years from the date of the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74853.

The bonds shall bear interest at a rate not exceeding 8 percent per year, payable annually or semiannually as may be prescribed by the board at the time of the issuance of the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

74854.

The board may provide for redemption of bonds before maturity at prices determined by it. A bond shall not be subject to call or redemption prior to maturity unless it contains a recital to that effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74855.

The bonds shall be in such denominations as the board may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------

74856.

The principal and interest shall be payable in lawful money of the United States at the office of the treasurer or such other place as may be designated or at either place at the option of the holder of the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74857.

The bonds shall be dated, numbered consecutively, signed by the president, and attested by the secretary with the official seal of the district. The interest coupons shall bear the actual or facsimile signature of the president.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Sale of Bonds and Use of Proceeds [74870. - 74872.]

74870.

The bonds as issued may be sold at such times and in such amounts as the board deems expedient, after a notice inviting bids therefor has been published in the district pursuant to Section 6062 of the Government Code. A certified check payable to the district for at least 2 percent of the amount of the bonds offered shall accompany each bid, conditioned that the bidder will accept and pay for the bonds bid for if awarded to him, otherwise such check shall be forfeited to the district and the amount thereof paid into the treasury. If no bids are received the bonds offered may be sold at private sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------

74871.

The proceeds from the sale of bonds shall be paid into the treasury of the district, placed to the credit of a special fund, and expended only for the purpose for which the indebtedness was created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74872.

If the board determines by resolution that (1) the expenditure of money raised by the sale of bonds for the purpose for which the bonds were voted is impracticable or unwise, or (2) that all of the purposes for which money raised by the sale of bonds have been fulfilled but that there is a surplus of such money remaining, the board may call a special election to obtain the consent of the voters to use the money for some other purpose for which the district may issue bonds.

The procedure shall be the same as when the bond proposition was originally submitted and the election may be consolidated with any other election, in which case one ballot may be used in the discretion of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Adoption of Improvement Acts [74900. - 74904.]

74900.

A district, in the construction of any work to be done or improvement made by it or within an improvement district formed pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 75000) of this division and in the levying of assessments and reassessments and the issuing of bonds to pay for costs and expenses of the work and improvements done or to be done, may use the Improvement Act of 1911, the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913, or the Improvement Bond Act of 1915. These acts are hereafter referred to in this chapter as the “improvement acts.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

74901.

Notwithstanding the provisions or limitations of any of the improvement acts relating to the work authorized to be done or the improvements authorized to be made thereunder, a district may acquire or construct, by the procedures permitted by this article, any improvements authorized by this division, and the improvements authorized to be constructed or acquired by the procedure permitted by this article, are restricted to those permitted by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74902.

In the application of the improvement acts to proceedings under this division, the terms used in those acts shall have the following meanings:

(a) “City council” or “council” means the board.

(b) “City” or “municipality” means the district.

(c) “Clerk” or “city clerk” means the secretary.

(d) “Superintendent of streets,” “street superintendent,” or “city engineer” means the chief engineer of the district or any other person appointed to perform such duties.

(e) “Tax collector” means the county tax collector.

(f) “Treasurer” or “city treasurer” means the treasurer.

(g) “Right-of-way” means any right-of-way owned or held by the district for the purpose of constructing or maintaining any work or improvements which the district is authorized to do.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74903.

The powers and duties conferred by the improvement acts upon boards, officers, and agents of cities shall be exercised by the board, officers, and agents of the district, respectively.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

74904.

No assessment or bond levied or issued pursuant to proceedings under any of the improvement acts, as authorized by this chapter, shall become a lien, and no person shall be deemed to have notice thereof, until a certified copy of the assessment in the proceedings under the improvement act being utilized, and the diagram attached to the assessment, are recorded in the office of the county recorder of each county in which any part of the lands assessed are located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Negotiable Promissory Notes [74950. - 74952.]

74950.

The district may issue negotiable promissory notes bearing interest at a rate not exceeding the rate set by Article 7 (commencing with Section 53530) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. The notes shall be general obligations of the district payable from revenues and assessment taxes, unless paid from other available funds of the district, in the same manner as bonds of the district. The maturity of the notes shall not be later than five years from the date thereof and the total aggregate amount of the notes outstanding at any one time shall not exceed the lesser of 2 percent of the assessed valuation of the taxable property in the district, according to the last assessment roll or five million dollars ($5,000,000), except that a district which has been formed for less than 18 months may not borrow an amount exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1558, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

74951.

“Taxable property,” as used in Section 74950, means:

(a) All lands and improvements within a district or improvement district, as the case may be, if the provisions of Section 74056 were complied with in the formation of the district or district within which the improvement district is created.

(b) All lands and improvements within an improvement district if the basis of taxation in the improvement district has been changed pursuant to Section 75151 from land to land and improvements.

(c) Land only within any district or improvement district not mentioned in subdivision (a) or (b) of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

74952.

If a district undertakes to issue promissory notes pursuant to the limitations set forth in Section 74950, the limitations provided in Sections 75357 and 75358 shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Issuance of Revenue Bonds Pursuant to the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 [74975. - 74977.]

74975.

Subject to the limitations of this chapter, revenue bonds, including refunding revenue bonds, may be issued by a district under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300), Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------

74976.

This chapter provides an alternative authority and procedure for the subject to which it relates, but does not affect any other law relating to such subject or a similar subject. When proceeding under the provisions of this chapter, such provisions alone need be followed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------

74977.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term “enterprise,” as used in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, shall be limited to and shall include only those works or property authorized to be acquired, constructed, improved or financed by a water conservation district pursuant to this division or any other applicable provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7. IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS [75000. - 75231.]



  CHAPTER 1. Improvement Districts for Issuance of Bonds [75000. - 75090.]



  ARTICLE 1. Initiation of Proceedings [75000. - 75002.]

75000.

Whenever 1,000 or more of the holders of title or evidence of title of land within a district, as shown by the records of the county assessor, desire to form an improvement district within a district, they may propose the formation of such an improvement district by filing a petition with the board. The petition shall contain a statement of the plan of the proposed improvement district and a description of the boundaries thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75001.

Upon receipt of the formation petition the board shall cause a survey to be made of the proposed improvement, and if it is found that the plan of improvement is feasible, the board shall cause to be prepared a report containing the plans and specifications of the improvement and an estimate of the cost thereof. The report shall be in such detail and be accompanied by such exhibits as will disclose the purpose sought to be accomplished and the means to be employed therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75002.

The report shall be filed in the office of the district and shall be subject to the inspection of all parties interested.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Hearing and Formation [75010. - 75016.]

75010.

After the filing of the report required by Section 75001, the board shall give notice of a hearing upon the formation petition by posting a notice thereof in three public places within the proposed improvement district and publishing such notice once a week for two weeks in some newspaper published in the county in which the office of the district is situated. The notice shall be posted not later than 20 days prior to the date set for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75011.

At the hearing the board shall hear such objections to the formation petition, the formation of the improvement district and its boundaries, and the plans, specifications, and estimates as may come before it, and shall make such changes in reference thereto as it considers proper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75012.

At the hearing the board may make such changes in the boundaries of the proposed improvement district as it deems advisable and shall define and establish the boundaries, but the board shall not modify the boundaries so as to exclude from the proposed improvement district any territory which may be benefited by the improvement district, or include within the proposed improvement district any land which will not in its judgment be benefited by the formation thereof.

If any additional lands are included in the proposed improvement district, the hearing of the petition shall be continued and the owners of the added lands shall be given not less than 20 days’ personal notice of the addition of such lands to the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75013.

At the hearing the board shall determine whether the petition complies with the requirements of Section 75000 and for that purpose shall hear all competent and relevant testimony in support or in opposition thereto. No defect in the form or contents of the petition or any proceeding therein shall invalidate any proceeding, but the petition shall have a sufficient number of qualified signatures attached thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75014.

If more than one-third of the holders of title or evidence of title of lands within the proposed improvement district object in writing at the hearing to the formation of the proposed improvement district, the board shall deny the formation petition and no further proceedings shall be had thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75015.

At the conclusion of the hearing, if the board determines that the improvement district should be formed, it shall make a final order approving the formation petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75016.

The order shall be entered in the minutes of the board and a copy thereof shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder of each county in which any of the lands of the improvement district are located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Calling of Bond Election [75030. - 75032.]

75030.

If the board makes the final order approving the formation petition, it may, by resolution adopted by a majority of its members, call an election for the purpose of authorizing the incurring of a bonded indebtedness by the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75031.

The resolution shall specify all of the following:

(a) The purpose for which bonds are proposed to be issued.

(b) The maximum rate of interest the bonds shall bear.

(c) The number of years, not exceeding 25, the whole or any part of the bonds are to run until maturity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75032.

The resolution shall further provide for submitting the question of the incurring of the indebtedness to the qualified electors of the improvement district at an election called for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Notice of Bond Election [75050. - 75051.]

75050.

Notice shall be given of the bond election by publication in a newspaper published in each of the counties in which the improvement district is situated, if there is one, at least once a week for three weeks previous to the election, by posting notice thereof in three public places in the improvement district, and by posting a copy in the office of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75051.

The notice of the bond election shall designate a name for the improvement district and describe the boundaries thereof. The notice shall also designate the respective election precincts and the polling place in each, the election officers, the time of the election, and the hours during which the polls will be kept open; provided, that the polls shall be opened not later than 8 o'clock a.m. and kept open until 7 o'clock p.m.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Bond Election [75060. - 75066.]

75060.

The bond election shall be conducted in accordance with the general election laws of the state as far as applicable and except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75061.

Several propositions may be submitted at the same bond election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75062.

Only qualified electors of the improvement district may vote at the bond election.

All electors residing within the improvement district whose names appear on the register of voters of the last general election and at any time within 40 days preceding the bond election are qualified electors of the improvement district eligible to vote at the bond election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75063.

The ballots at the bond election shall contain a general statement of the amount and purpose of the bonds to be issued. To the right of or below the statement of the proposition to be voted on, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 69.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

75064.

Immediately after the bond election, the election officers shall publicly count the votes and make and transmit a report of the result of the election to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75065.

If two-thirds of the votes cast upon the proposition favor the proposition submitted, the proposition shall be deemed to have been accepted by the voters and to authorize the incurring of a bonded indebtedness and the issuance of bonds in the amount and for the purpose stated in the proposition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 70.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

75066.

If the bond election has been fairly held and conducted, no informality or omission to perform a prescribed duty shall be held to invalidate or affect the legality of any bonded debt authorized to be incurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Powers of the Board [75080. - 75082.]

75080.

Any improvement district formed pursuant to this chapter shall be under the supervision, direction, and control of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75081.

The board shall have the same power, authority, and jurisdiction over and with reference to an improvement district formed pursuant to this chapter that it possesses over and with reference to the district and improvements made within and chargeable to the entire district; provided, that any obligation created in behalf of such an improvement district shall be a charge against only the property situated within the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75082.

All provisions of this division, insofar as they are applicable, including provisions for bonds and assessments, shall apply to and govern improvement districts formed pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Payment of Bonds from Assessments Upon Real Property [75090. - 75090.]

75090.

The bonded indebtedness of an improvement district formed pursuant to this chapter may be made payable from assessments to be levied upon all real property in the improvement district by proceedings taken in the manner provided in this article and shall be so payable if the proceedings for the formation of the district so require.

In either case, the petition for the formation of the improvement district, the notice of hearing, the resolution calling the bond election, and the notice of the bond election shall contain a statement that any bonds authorized to be issued by the improvement district shall be payable, both principal and interest, from assessments to be levied upon all real property in the improvement district as finally formed.

If the bonds then receive the vote required under Section 75065, all the bonds shall be payable solely from assessments levied upon all real property in the improvement district, and all such real property therein shall be liable to be taxed for the purpose of paying principal and interest of such bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Special Improvement Districts [75110. - 75168.6.]



  ARTICLE 1. In General [75110. - 75110.]

75110.

A special improvement district may be formed of an area benefited thereby, a bonded indebtedness of such special improvement district may be incurred under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 74790) of Part 6 of this division, negotiable promissory notes may be issued therefor under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 74950) of Part 6 of this division, contracts therefor under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 74570) of Part 5 of this division may be entered into by the board and approved by the voters of such special improvement district, the tax base therein may be changed from land to land and improvements, special assessments may be authorized to be levied therein under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 75390) of Part 8 of this division, and annual assessment taxes may be levied therein under Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 75350) and 2 (commencing with Section 75370) of Part 8 of this division, all as provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Initiation of Proceedings [75120. - 75122.]

75120.

Whenever the board deems it necessary for the district to form a special improvement district and to perform the other acts provided in this chapter as to an area less than the entire district, it shall adopt a resolution of intention to form such a special improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75121.

The resolution of intention shall set forth all of the following:

(a) A declaration of the necessity for the special improvement district.

(b) The purpose of forming the special improvement district and of performing the other acts authorized in this chapter.

(c) The amount of the proposed bonded indebtedness or contract or special assessment.

(d) If it is proposed that the basis of taxation shall be changed from land to land and improvements, a statement to that effect.

(e) The boundaries of the proposed district that will be benefited.

(f) The title of the proposed special improvement district, which shall be “____ Water Conservation District Special Improvement District No. __.”

(g) The date on which a hearing will be held in the office of the board upon the proposal to form the special improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75122.

A copy of the resolution of intention shall be published pursuant to Section 6062 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation published in the proposed special improvement district, if there is one, and if none, then in a newspaper published in the district. If no newspaper is published in the district, the resolution of intention shall be published in a newspaper published in the county and circulated in the district, and copies shall be posted in three public places in the proposed special improvement district at least 10 days before the day fixed for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Hearing and Formation [75130. - 75135.]

75130.

At the hearing, any person interested, including persons owning property within the proposed special improvement district, may appear and present any matters material to the matters set forth in the resolution of intention.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75131.

The board may exclude from the proposed special improvement district any territory that, in its opinion, would not be benefited by being in the proposed special improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75132.

Lands not included in the original resolution of intention shall not be included within the proposed special improvement district except at a hearing held by the board on the inclusion thereof, after notice of such hearing has been duly given in the manner provided for the principal hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75133.

The board shall not modify the boundaries of the proposed special improvement district so as to exclude therefrom any land which would be benefited by the formation thereof, nor shall it include therein land which will not, in the judgment of the board, be benefited.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75134.

If protest has been made, prior to its final determination for formation of the district, by the owners of land (or by the owners of real property, in the event of the applicability of the provision of Section 74056) within the proposed special improvement district the assessed value of which, as shown by the last equalized assessment roll, constitutes more than one-half of the total assessed value of the land or real property, as the case may be, within the proposed special improvement district, the board shall so find and the proceeding shall terminate. The board shall order the proceeding terminated when such protests are received.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75135.

At the conclusion of the hearing, after making all necessary and proper changes in the boundaries, the board shall, by resolution, form the special improvement district and fix and determine its boundaries.

The determination of the board as to the area benefited by the bond or other proceedings shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Election [75150. - 75153.]

75150.

After the formation of the special improvement district, the board shall call an election for the purpose of submitting to the voters therein the question of incurring the bonded indebtedness, approving the contract, or levying the special assessment for which it was formed, which election shall be conducted in the manner provided for incurring of a bonded indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75151.

When a district has not been formed pursuant to Section 74056, and it is proposed that the basis of taxation in the special improvement district shall be changed from land to land and improvements, a statement to that effect shall be contained in the proposition submitted to the electors of the special improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75152.

If a proposition of incurring the bonded indebtedness is approved by two-thirds of the voters voting on such proposition, or if a proposition of approving a contract, of levying a special assessment, or of changing the basis of taxation is approved by a majority of the voters voting on such proposition, such proposition has carried.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

75153.

No informality in any proceeding under this chapter, including the conduct of any election, not substantially affecting adversely the legal rights of any person, shall invalidate any such proceedings.

Any action wherein the validity of any such proceeding is denied shall be commenced within three months of the date of such proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Inclusion of Territory [75160. - 75160.]

75160.

Territory may be added to a special improvement district in the manner provided in this chapter for its formation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Alternative Provisions for Government of Special Improvement Districts [75165. - 75166.3.]

75165.

Any special improvement district formed pursuant to this chapter shall be under the supervision, direction and control of the board of directors of the water conservation district, unless proceedings are taken under this article for the election of a board of trustees for such special improvement district, in which event such special improvement district shall be under the supervision, direction and control of such board of trustees. Such directors or trustees, as the case may be, shall have the same power, authority and jurisdiction over and with reference to the special improvement district that the board of directors possesses over and with reference to the water conservation district and improvements made within and chargeable to the entire conservation district provided that any obligation created in behalf of a special improvement district shall be a charge against only the properties situated within such special improvement district. All provisions of this division, insofar as they are applicable, including all provisions relating to bonds and assessments, shall apply to and govern special improvement districts formed under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1651.)
-------------------------------------------

75165.1.

A petition signed by holders of title or evidence of title of land representing at least fifteen percent (15%) of the assessed valuation of taxable land in the special improvement district may be presented to the board of directors requesting that the special improvement district be governed by a board of trustees to be elected by qualified electors in the special improvement district in lieu of the board of directors. The last equalized county assessment roll of the county in which the greater portion of the lands within the special improvement district are situated shall be prima facie evidence of ownership for purposes of this section, and a finding by the board of directors as to the sufficiency of the signatures based on certification by the secretary of the district shall be conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1651.)
-------------------------------------------

75165.2.

Upon receiving the petition and determining its adequacy, the board of directors shall set it for hearing and give notice of the time and place of the hearing by causing notices to be posted in 3 public places in the special improvement district at least 10 days before the date of hearing. The board shall also cause a copy of the notice to be published in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the county in which the greater portion of the district is situated, and circulated in the special improvement district, once a week for at least 2 weeks prior to the date set for hearing, with the first publication at least 10 days prior to such date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1651.)
-------------------------------------------

75165.3.
